Missouri, session 2026, SB1406.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 620, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 620.1641, to read as
follows:
620.1641. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Missouri Defense and Energy Independence Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Department", the Missouri department of economic
development;
(2) "Qualified amount", for a qualified company in a
given tax year, a portion of such qualified company's
qualified conversion costs, subject to the limitations
provided in this section;
(3) "Qualified company", a firm, partnership, joint
venture, association, private or public corporation
regardless of whether organized for profit, or headquarters
of such entity registered to do business in Missouri, that
is a nontraditional defense contractor, as such term is
defined in 10 U.S.C. Section 3014, as amended, and that
incurs qualified conversion costs;

SB 1406 2
(4) "Qualified conversion costs", costs a qualified
company incurs in converting such company to produce
chemicals, metals, gases, or rare earth minerals that will
be used for projects designed to decrease or eliminate
reliance on foreign-produced chemicals, metals, gases, or
rare earth minerals used in the production of energy
projects or Department of Defense or successor agency
projects;
(5) "Tax credit", tax credits issued by the department
to offset the state taxes imposed by chapters 143 and 148,
excluding the withholding tax imposed under sections 143.191
to 143.265.
3. (1) For all tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2027, a qualified company shall be allowed to
claim a tax credit against the qualified company's state tax
liability in an amount equal to the qualified company's
qualified amount, subject to the limitations provided in
this subsection.
(2) The total qualified amount a qualified company
shall be allowed to claim under this section shall not
exceed fifteen percent of the cumulative amount of tax
credits allowed under subsection 4 of this section. One-
fourth of such total qualified amount a qualified company is
eligible to receive shall be issued in each of the four tax
years immediately following the tax year for which the
qualified company claimed the tax credit.
4. The cumulative amount of tax credits allowed to all
taxpayers under this section shall not exceed forty million
dollars per tax year. If the amount of tax credits claimed
in a tax year under this section exceeds forty million
dollars, tax credits shall be allowed based on the order in
which they are claimed.

SB 1406 3
5. (1) Tax credits issued under the provisions of
this section shall not be refundable.
(2) No tax credit claimed under this section shall be
carried forward to any subsequent tax year.
(3) Tax credits claimed pursuant to this section may
be assigned, transferred, sold, or otherwise conveyed.
6. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury
the "Grants for Independence from Foreign Influence Fund",
which shall consist of at least ten million dollars
appropriated by the general assembly and any gifts,
contributions, grants, or bequests received from federal,
private, or other sources. The state treasurer shall be
custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170
and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements.
The fund shall be a dedicated fund and, upon appropriation,
moneys in the fund shall be used solely as provided in
subsection 7 of this section.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080
to the contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the end
of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the
fund in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any
interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
7. (1) The department shall develop and implement
grants for independence from foreign influence as provided
in this subsection.
(2) The department shall establish procedures for the
solicitation, evaluation, and approval of grant applications
received from a qualified company. A qualified company may
submit a grant application for the award of moneys for

SB 1406 4
qualified conversion costs incurred by the qualified company
as provided in this subsection.
(3) The department shall evaluate each application and
approve or reject such application. Subject to
appropriations, upon approval of an application, the
department shall administer a grant award of moneys from the
grants for independence from foreign influence fund in an
amount not to exceed five hundred thousand dollars per grant
application.
(4) Moneys granted to a qualified company under this
section shall be used solely for qualified conversion costs
incurred before the completion of the conversion of the
qualified company.
8. The department shall promulgate all necessary rules
and regulations for the administration of this section
including, but not limited to, rules relating to the
verification of a qualified company's qualified amount and
qualified conversion costs. Any rule or portion of a rule,
as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created
100 under the authority delegated in this section shall become
101 effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of
102 the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
103 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
104 if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
105 pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
106 date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
107 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
108 authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
109 2026, shall be invalid and void.
110 9. Pursuant to section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset
111 act:

SB 1406 5
112 (1) The program authorized pursuant to this section
113 shall automatically sunset six years after the effective
114 date of this section unless reauthorized by an act of the
115 general assembly;
116 (2) This section shall terminate on September first of
117 the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in
118 which the program authorized pursuant to this section is
119 sunset; and
120 (3) The provisions of this subsection shall not be
121 construed to impair or impede the state's fulfillment of any
122 obligations, including the authorization, issuance, or
123 redemption of tax credits, incurred pursuant to this section
124 prior to the date the program authorized pursuant to this
125 section is sunset.
✓